District of Columbia statutes.
40-402

Prohibited acts.

(a)

An operator shall not knowingly permit a leased space at a self-service storage facility to be used as a residence.

(b)

An occupant shall not use a leased space as a residence.

Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-64, § 3, 50 DCR 9303